Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF830.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1452YH (3) 91 ll/ns H.F. 830 Section 1. Section 123.24, subsection 2, paragraphs a and b, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. The manufacturerâs price or the minimum unit price, 3 whichever is greater . 4 b. A markup of up to fifty percent of the wholesale price 5 paid by the department for the alcoholic liquor or the minimum 6 unit price, whichever is greater . The department may increase 7 the markup on selected kinds of alcoholic liquor sold by the 8 department if the average return to the department on all sales 9 of alcoholic liquor does not exceed the wholesale price paid by 10 the department or the minimum unit price, whichever is greater, 11 and the fifty percent markup. 12 Sec. 2. Section 123.24, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. For purposes of this section, âminimum 15 unit priceâ means an amount equal to fifty cents per eighteen 16 milliliters of alcohol in the package of alcoholic liquor, as 17 determined by the department. 18